Massachusetts, session 194th, S451.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 37O of Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after the word “law” in line 133, the following 
sentence:- “The board shall also establish standards for the inclusion in the curriculum at all 
grade levels, frameworks designed to teach students methods of resolving interpersonal disputes 
in productive and effective ways and which shall discourage the use of violence or other forms of 
abuse in the resolution of such disputes”.